Hawaii statutes.
[CHAPTER
302H]

Hawaiian language medium education

Law Journals and Reviews

"Officially" What? The Legal Rights and
Implications of ‘Ōlelo Hawai‘i. 30 UH L. Rev. 243 (2007).

"Language Is Never About Language": Eliminating
Language Bias in Federal Education Law to Further Indigenous Rights. 37 UH L.
Rev. 381 (2015).

Section

302H-1 Hawaiian language medium education
program;

established

302H-2 Attendance and eligibility

302H-3 Office of Hawaiian language medium
education;

personnel

302H-4 Facilities or transportation

302H-5 Student performance

302H-6 Hawaiian language medium state education
agency;

districts and complex areas

302H-7 Collaboration

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next